Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.160

Petitions—Time for filing.

The time for submitting initiative or referendum petitions to the secretary of state for filing is as follows:

(1) A referendum petition ordering and directing that the whole or some part or parts of an act passed by the legislature be referred to the people for their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election or a special election ordered by the legislature, must be submitted not more than ninety days after the final adjournment of the session of the legislature which passed the act;

(2) An initiative petition proposing a measure to be submitted to the people for their approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election, must be submitted not less than four months before the date of such election;

(3) An initiative petition proposing a measure to be submitted to the legislature at its next ensuing regular session must be submitted not less than ten days before the commencement of the session.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1817. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.79.140; prior: 1913 c 138 s 12, part; RRS s 5408, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.140.]

NOTES:

Initiative, referendum, time for filing: State Constitution Art. 2 s 1 (a) and (d) (Amendment 7).

Measures, petitions, time for filing various types: RCW 29A.72.030.